Tennessee, session 114, SB0383.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 1-3-121, is amended by deleting the
section and substituting:
Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a cause of action exists in state
court under this chapter for any affected person who seeks declaratory or injunctive
relief in any action brought in such state court regarding the legality or constitutionality of
a governmental action. A cause of action does not exist under this chapter to seek
damages. This section does not waive or abrogate the immunities and privileges
available to this state, state entities, and state officials under existing federal or state
law, or expand the justiciability doctrines applicable to state courts.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it,
and applies to actions filed on or after that date.
SB0383
002323
- 1 -